North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-39 Cultivated Ginseng [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 71, § 2]

4-39-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 74, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 71, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

4-39-02.
Growers and dealers — Registration — Fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 74, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 71, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

4-39-03.
Sale or shipment of cultivated ginseng. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 74, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 71, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

4-39-04.
Inspection or submission of records. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 74, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 71, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

4-39-05.
Certain records not public information. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 74, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 71, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

4-39-06.
Enforcement actions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 74, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 71, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

4-39-07.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 74, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 71, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.